District of Columbia statutes.
38-313

Rules.

The Mayor shall promulgate rules pursuant to this chapter. The proposed rules shall be submitted to the Council for a 45-day period of review, excluding Saturdays, Sundays, holidays, and days of Council recess. If the Council does not approve or disapprove the proposed rules, in whole or in part, by resolution within the 45-day period, the proposed rules shall be deemed approved.

Sept. 8, 1960, 74 Stat. 854, Pub. L. 86-725, § 16
as added Dec. 7, 2004, D.C. Law 15-205, § 4012(c), 51 DCR 8441
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 4012(c) of Fiscal Year 2005 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2004 (D.C. Act 15-486, August 2, 2004, 51 DCR 8236).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 4012(c) of Fiscal Year 2005 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2004 (D.C. Act 15-594, October 26, 2004, 51 DCR 11725).